Illinois, session 104th, HB2726.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Natural Resources 5(Conservation) Law of the Civil Administrative Code of 6Illinois is amended by adding Section 805-135 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 805/805-135 new)8    Sec. 805-135. Rewilding. The Department of Natural 9Resources has the power to exercise all rights, powers, and 10duties conferred by law and to take measures that are 11necessary for the implementation of rewilding as a 12conservation strategy in this State, including, but not 13limited to, the restoration of land to its natural state, the 14reintroduction of native species, particularly apex predators 15and keystone species, and the restoration of ecological 16processes as defined by State-specific baselines.